en: Cuisine: Balkan; British; Cajun; Caribbean; Central European; Chinese; Creole; East African; Eastern European; French; Hawaiian; Indian; Italian; Japanese; Korean; Latin American; Mediterranean; Mexican; Middle Eastern; North African; Oceanian; Scandinavian; South African; Southeast Asian; Southern United States; Southwestern United States; Spanish; Thai; Vietnamese; West African; Other
pl: Kuchnia: bałkańska; brytyjska; Cajun; karaibska; Środkowoeuropejski; chiński; kreolska; wschodnioafrykańska; wschodnioeuropejska; francuski; hawajska; indyjska; włoski; japoński; koreański; latynoamerykańska; śródziemnomorska; meksykańska; bliskowschodnia; północnoafrykańska; oceaniczna; Skandynawskie; południowoafrykańska; Z Azji Południowo-Wschodniej; Z południa Stanów Zjednoczonych; Z południowego zachodu Stanów Zjednoczonych; hiszpański; tajski; wietnamski; zachodnioafrykańska; Pozostałe
ko: 요리: 발칸; 영국; 케이준; 카리브; 중앙 유럽; 중국어; 크리올; 동아프리카; 동유럽; 프랑스어; 하와이; 인도; 이탈리아어; 일본어; 한국어; 라틴 아메리카; 지중해; 멕시코; 중동; 북아프리카; 오세아니아; 스칸디나비아; 남아프리카공화국; 동남아시아; 미국 남부; 미국 남서부; 스페인어; 태국어; 베트남어; 서아프리카; 기타
ro-RO: Bucătărie specifică: Balcanică; Britanică; Cajun; Caraibiană; Europa Centrală; Chinezească; Creolă; Africa de Est; Europa de Est; Franceză; Havaiană; Indiană; Italiană; Japoneză; Coreeană; America Latină; Mediteraneană; Mexicană; Orientul Mijlociu; Africa de Nord; Oceania; Scandinavă; Africa de Sud; Asia de Sud-Est; Sudul Statelor Unite; Sud-vestul Statelor Unite; Spaniolă; Thailandeză; Vietnameză; Africa de Vest; Altele
fi: Ruoka: Balkan; Brittiläinen; Cajun; Karibialainen; Keskieurooppalainen; Kiina; Kreoli; Itäafrikkalainen; Itäeurooppalainen; Ranska; Havaijilainen; Intialainen; Italia; Japani; Korea; Latinalaisamerikkalainen; Välimerellinen; Meksikolainen; Lähi-idästä; Pohjoisafrikkalainen; Oseanialainen; Skandinaavinen; Eteläafrikkalainen; Kaakkoisaasialainen; Eteläyhdysvaltalainen; Lounaisyhdysvaltalainen; Espanja; thai; Vietnam; Länsiafrikkalainen; Muu
pt-BR: Cozinha: Balcânico; Britânico; Cajun; Caribenho; Europa Central; Chinês; Crioulo; Africano oriental; Europeu oriental; Francês; Havaiano; Indiano; Italiano; Japonês; Coreano; Latino americano; Mediterrâneo; Mexicano; Nascido no Oriente Médio; Norte da África; Oceânico; Escandinavo; Sul-africano; Sudeste asiático; Sul dos Estados Unidos; Sudoeste dos Estados Unidos; Espanhol; Tailandês; Vietnamita; Africano ocidental; Outro
nb: Mat: Balkansk; Britisk; Cajun; Karibisk; Sentraleuropeisk; Kinesisk; Creolsk; Østafrikansk; Østeuropeisk; Fransk; Hawaiisk; Indisk; Italiensk; Japansk; Koreansk; Latinamerikansk; Middelhavsk; Meksikansk; Fra Midtøsten; Nordafrikansk; Oseanisk; Skandinavisk; Sørafrikansk; Sørøst-asiatisk; Sørlige USA; Sørvestlige USA; Spansk; Thai; Vietnamesisk; Vestafrikansk; Annen
es: Cocina: Balcánico; Británico; Cajún; Caribeño; Europa Central; Chino; Criollo; Africano oriental; Europa del este; Francés; Hawaiano; Indio; Italiano; Japonés; Coreano; Latinoamericano; Mediterráneo; Mexicano; Oriente Medio; Norte de África; Oceanía; Escandinavo; Sudafricano; Sudeste Asiatico; Sur de Estados Unidos; Sudoeste de Estados Unidos; Español; Tailandés; Vietnamita; Africano occidental; Otros
hu: Konyha: Balkán; Brit; Cajun; Karibi; Közép-európai; Kínai; Kreol; Kelet-afrikai; Kelet-európai; Francia; Hawaii; Indiai; Olasz; Japán; Koreai; Latin-amerikai; Mediterrán; Mexikói; Közel-keleti; Észak-afrikai; Óceániai; Skandináv; Dél-afrikai; Délkelet-ázsiai; Az Egyesült Államok déli része; Az Egyesült Államok délnyugati része; Spanyol; Thai; Vietnámi; Nyugat-afrikai; Egyéb
zh-TW: 菜餚: 巴爾幹; 英國; 卡津; 加勒比海; 中歐; 中文; 克里奧爾; 東非; 東歐; 法語; 夏威夷; 印度; 義大利語; 日語; 韓語; 拉丁美洲; 地中海; 墨西哥; 中東; 北非; 大洋洲; 斯堪地那維亞; 南非; 東南亞; 美國南部; 美國西南部; 西班牙語; 泰語; 越南語; 東非; 其他
ru: Кухня: Балканская; Британская; Каджунская; Карибская; Центральноевропейская; Китайская; Креольская; Восточноафриканская; Восточноевропейская; Французская; Гавайская; Индийская; Итальянская; Японская; Корейская; Латиноамериканская; Средиземноморская; Мексиканская; Ближневосточная; Североафриканская; Океанская; Скандинавская; Южноафриканская; Юго-Восточной Азии; Юга США; Юго-запада США; Испанская; Тайская; Вьетнамская; Западноафриканская; Другая
pt-PT: Cozinha: Balcãs; Britânico; Cajun; Caribe; Europa Central; Chinês; Crioulo; África Oriental; Leste Europeu; Francês; Havaiano; Indiano; Italiano; Japonês; Coreano; América Latina; Mediterrâneo; Mexicano; Médio Oriente; Norte de África; Oceania; Escandinavo; África do Sul; Sudeste asiático; Sul dos Estados Unidos; Sudoeste dos Estados Unidos; Espanhol; Tailandês; Vietnamita; África Ocidental; Outro
de: Cuisine: Balkanisch; Britisch; Cajun; Karibisch; Mitteleuropäisch; Chinesisch; Kreolisch; Ostafrikanisch; Osteuropäisch; Französisch; Hawaiianisch; Indisch; Italienisch; Japanisch; Koreanisch; Lateinamerikanisch; Mediterran; Mexikanisch; Nahöstlich; Nordafrikanisch; Ozeanisch; Skandinavisch; Südafrikanisch; Südostasiatisch; Südliche USA; Südwestliche USA; Spanisch; Thailändisch; Vietnamesisch; Westafrikanisch; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Kuchyňa: Balkánsky; Britský; Cajunský; Karibský; Stredoeurópsky; Čínsky; Kreolský; Východoafrický; Východoeurópsky; Francúzsky; Havajský; Indický; Taliansky; Japonský; Kórejský; Latinskoamerický; Stredomorský; Mexický; Blízky východ; Severoafrický; Oceánsky; Škandinávsky; Juhoafrický; Juhovýchodná Ázia; Juh Spojených štátov amerických; Juhozápad Spojených štátov amerických; Španielsky; Thajský; Vietnamský; Západoafrický; Iné
sl-SI: Kulinarika: Balkanska; Britanska; Cajunska; Karibska; Srednjeevropska; Kitajska; Kreolska; Vzhodnoafriška; Vzhodnoevropska; Francoska; Havajska; Indijska; Italijanska; Japonska; Korejska; Latinskoameriška; Sredozemska; Mehiška; Bližnjevzhodna; Severnoafriška; Oceanijska; Skandinavska; Južnoafriška; Jugovzhodnoazijska; Južna ZDA; Južnozahodna ZDA; Španska; Tajska; Vietnamska; Zahodnoafriška; Drugo
fr: Cuisine: Balkan; Britannique; Cajun; Antillais; Europe centrale; Chinois; Créole; D’Afrique de l'Est; d’Europe de l’Est; Français; Hawaïen; Indien; Italien; Japonais; Coréen; Latino-américain; Méditerranéen; Mexicain; Moyen-Orient; D’Afrique du Nord; Océanien; Scandinave; D\\Afrique du Sud; Asie du Sud-Est; Sud des États-Unis; Sud-ouest des États-Unis; Espagnol; Thai; Vietnamien; D’Afrique de l'Est; Autre
hr-HR: Kuhinja: Balkanska; Britanska; Cajunska; Karipska; Srednjoeuropska; Kineska; Kreolska; Istočnoafrička; Istočnoeuropska; Francuska; Havajska; Indijska; Talijanska; Japanska; Korejska; Latinoamerička; Mediteranska; Meksička; Bliskoistočna; Sjevernoafrička; Oceanijska; Skandinavska; Južnoafrička; Kuhinja jugoistočne Azije; Kuhinja južnih Sjedinjenih Država; Kuhinja jugozapadnih Sjedinjenih Država; Španjolska; Thai; Vijetnamska; Zapadnoafrička; Ostalo
ja: 料理: バルカン料理; イギリス料理; ケイジャン料理; カリブ料理; 中央ヨーロッパ; 中国語; クレオール料理; 東アフリカ料理; 東ヨーロッパ料理; フランス語; ハワイ料理; インド料理; イタリア語; 日本語; 韓国語; ラテンアメリカ料理; 地中海料理; メキシコ料理; 中東料理; 北アフリカ料理; オセアニア料理; スカンジナビア; 南アフリカ料理; 東南アジア; 米国南部; 米国南西部; スペイン語; タイ語; ベトナム語; 西アフリカ料理; その他
el: Κουζίνα: Βαλκανική; Βρετανική; Κεϊτζούν; Καραϊβική; Κεντροευρωπαϊκή; Κινεζική; Κρεόλ; Ανατολικής Αφρικής; Ανατολικής Ευρώπης; Γαλλική; Χαβάης; Ινδιάνικες; Ιταλική; Ιαπωνική; Κορεατική; Λατινικής Αμερικής; Μεσογειακή; Μεξικανική; Μέσης Ανατολής; Βόρειας Αφρικής; Ωκεανίας; Σκανδιναβική; Νοτιοαφρικανική; Νοτιοανατολικής Ασίας; Νοτίων Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών; Νοτιοδυτικών Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών; Ισπανική; Ταϊλανδέζικη; Βιετναμέζικη; Δυτικής Αφρικής; Άλλο
zh-CN: 美食: 巴尔干的; 英国的; 卡津; 加勒比海; 中欧; 中文; 克里奥尔; 东非; 东欧; 法语; 夏威夷; 印度的; 意大利语; 日语; 韩语; 拉丁美洲; 地中海; 墨西哥的; 中东的; 北非; 大洋洲; 斯堪的纳维亚; 南非的; 东南亚; 美国南部; 美国西南部; 西班牙语; 泰语; 越南语; 东非的; 其他
da: Køkken: Balkan; Britisk; Cajun; Caribisk; Centraleuropæisk; Kinesisk; Kreolsk; Østafrikansk; Østeuropæisk; Fransk; Hawaiiansk; Indisk; Italiensk; Japansk; Koreansk; Latinamerikansk; Middelhavet; Mexicansk; Mellemøstligt; Nordafrikansk; Oceanisk; Skandinavisk; Sydafrikansk; Sydøstasiatisk; Sydlige USA; Sydvestlige USA; Spansk; Thai; Vietnamesisk; Vestafrikansk; Andet
sv: Kök: Balkan; Bittiskt; Cajun; Karibiskt; Centraleuropeisk; Kinesiska; Kreol; Östafrikanskt; Östeuropeiskt; Franska; Hawaiianskt; Indiskt; Italienska; Japanska; Koreanska; Latinamerikanskt; Mediterranskt; Mexikanskt; Mellanöstern; Nordafrikanskt; Oceanian; Skandinavisk; Sydafrikanskt; Sydöstasiatisk; Södra USA; Sydvästra USA; Spanska; Thai; Vietnamesiska; Östafrikanskt; Annat
bg-BG: Кухня: Балканска; Британска; Каджунска; Карибска; Централноевропейска; Китайска; Креолска; Източноафриканска; Източноевропейска; Френска; Хавайска; Индийска; Италианска; Японска; Корейска; Латиноамериканска; Средиземноморска; Мексиканска; Близкоизточна; Северноафриканска; Океания; Скандинавска; Южноафриканска; Югоизточноазиятска; Южни Съединени щати; Югозападни Съединени щати; Испанска; Тайландска; Виетнамска; Западноафриканска; Други
vi: Ẩm thực: Kiểu Balkan; Kiểu Anh; Kiểu Cajun; Kiểu Caribe; Trung Âu; Tiếng Trung; Kiểu Creole; Kiểu Đông Phi; Kiểu Đông Âu; Tiếng Pháp; Kiểu Hawaii; Kiểu Ấn Độ; Tiếng Ý; Tiếng Nhật; Tiếng Hàn; Kiểu Mỹ La-tinh; Kiểu Địa Trung Hải; Kiểu Mexico; Kiểu Trung Đông; Kiểu Bắc Phi; Kiểu Châu Đại Dương; Phong cách Scandinavian; Kiểu Nam Phi; Đông Nam Á; Miền Nam Hoa Kỳ; Tây Nam Hoa Kỳ; Tiếng Tây Ban Nha; Tiếng Thái; Tiếng Việt; Kiểu Tây Phi; Khác
lt-LT: Virtuvė: Balkanų; Britų; Kajunų; Karibų; Vidurio Europos; Kinų; Kreolų; Rytų Afrikos; Rytų Europos; Prancūzų; Havajų; Indų; Italų; Japonų; Korėjiečių; Lotynų amerikiečių; Viduržemio jūros; Meksikiečių; Artimųjų Rytų; Šiaurės Afrikos; Okeanijos; Skandinaviška; Pietų Afrikos; Pietryčių Azijos; Pietinių JAV valstijų; Pietvakarinių JAV valstijų; Ispanų; Tajų; Vietnamiečių; Vakarų Afrikos; Kita
tr: Mutfak: Balkan; İngiliz; Cajun; Karayipler; Orta Avrupa; Çince; Kreole; Doğu Afrika; Doğu Avrupa; Fransızca; Hawaii; Hint; İtalyanca; Japonca; Korece; Latin Amerika; Akdeniz; Meksika; Orta Doğu; Kuzey Afrika; Okyanusya; İskandinav; Güney Afrika; Güneydoğu Asya; Güney ABD; Güneybatı ABD; İspanyolca; Tay dili; Vietnamca; Doğu Afrika; Diğer
it: Cucina: Balcanico; Britannico; Cajun; Caraibico; Centroeuropea; Cinese; Creolo; Africano orientale; Europeo orientale; Francese; Hawaiano; Indiano; Italiano; Giapponese; Coreano; Latino americano; Mediterraneo; Messicano; Medio orientale; Nordafricano; Oceaniano; Scandinavo; Sudafricano; Sud est asiatica; Sud degli Stati Uniti; Sud-ovest degli Stati Uniti; Spagnolo; Tailandese; Vietnamita; Africano occidentale; Altro
cs: Kuchyně (styl vaření): Balkánská; Britská; Cajunská; Karibská; Střední Evropa; čínština; Kreolská; Východoafrická; Východoevropská; francouzština; Havajská; Indická; italština; japonština; korejština; Latinskoamerická; Středomořská; Mexická; Blízkovýchodní; Severoafrická; Oceánská; Skandinávský; Jihoafrická; Jihovýchodní Asie; Jižní Spojené státy; Jihozápadní Spojené státy; španělština; thajština; vietnamština; Západoafrická; Jiné
th: มื้ออาหาร: บอลข่าน; อังกฤษ; เคจัน; แคริบเบียน; ยุโรปกลาง; ภาษาจีน; ครีโอล; แอฟริกาตะวันออก; ยุโรปตะวันออก; ภาษาฝรั่งเศส; ฮาวาย; อินเดีย; ภาษาอิตาลี; ภาษาญี่ปุ่น; ภาษาเกาหลี; ละตินอเมริกา; เมดิเตอร์เรเนียน; เม็กซิกัน; ตะวันออกกลาง; แอฟริกาเหนือ; โอเชียเนีย; แบบสแกนดิเนเวีย; แอฟริกาใต้; เอเชียตะวันออกเฉียงใต้; สหรัฐอเมริกาตอนใต้; สหรัฐอเมริกาตอนตะวันตกเฉียงใต้; ภาษาสเปน; ภาษาไทย; ภาษาเวียดนาม; แอฟริกาตะวันตก; อื่นๆ
nl: Keuken: Balkan; Brits; Cajun; Caribisch; Centraal-Europees; Chinees; Creools; Oost-Afrikaans; Oost-Europeaans; Frans; Hawaïaans; Indisch; Italiaans; Japans; Koreaans; Latijns-Amerikaans; Mediterraneaans; Mexicaans; Midden-Oosten; Noord-Afrikaans; Oceanisch; Scandinavisch; Zuid-Afrikaans; Zuidoost-Aziatisch; Zuidelijke Verenigde Staten; Zuidwestelijke Verenigde Staten; Spaans; Thai; Vietnamees; West-Afrikaans; Andere